Utah statutes.
35A-3-204.   Duties of director.

The director shall:

(1)  enforce rules made by the department regulating the use of services provided by the office;

(2)  supervise office staff and prepare an annual work plan; and

(3)  apply for, accept, and expend gifts or donations from public or private sources to assist the office in fulfilling its statutory obligations.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 375, 1997 General Session

